California, session 20252026, AB2729.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Affordable and comprehensive health care coverage should be accessible to all Californians to protect their health and financial security.(b) Fourteen million five hundred thousand Californians are covered by Medi-Cal.(c) Despite significant progress in expanding health care coverage, an estimated 2,500,000 Californians remained uninsured in 2024, and many more are underinsured or struggle to afford care.(d) Federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 119-21), passed by a partisan vote in a Republican-controlled Congress and signed by President Donald J. Trump Trump, will significantly increase the number of people who are uninsured and go without the health care that they need.(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a fund within the Department of Finance that would receive deposits and to appropriate moneys to the State Department of Health Care Services for the sole purpose of preventing loss of or restoring health care coverage, benefits, or access to care following the passage of federal House Resolution 1 and subsequent state budget actions.SEC. 2. Section 14199.5 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:14199.5. (a) The Employer Responsibility for Medi-Cal Trust Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. (b) The fund shall consist of new taxes and deposits, including, but not limited to, employer penalties, as specified in the Budget Act of 2026. The total amount of moneys that may be deposited in the fund from all sources shall be determined by the Director of Finance, in consultation with the Treasurer.(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years to the State Department of Health Care Services to fund direct and indirect costs of administering the Medi-Cal program in a manner necessary to prevent loss of or to restore health care coverage, benefits, or access to care following the passage of federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 119-21) and subsequent state budget actions.(d) This section shall become operative only if the Medicaid provisions of federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 119-21) are not repealed prior to January 1, 2027.SEC. 3. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:Recent federal actions under federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 119-21) threaten to increase barriers to health care coverage, resulting in significant coverage losses that will disproportionately affect working families, immigrants with humanitarian protections, and communities already facing systemic inequities in access to care. This act creates a fund to provide a dedicated, flexible funding stream to help the state to maintain access to health care.